Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.230

Legislative—Ordinances—Time of going into effect.

Ordinances shall not go into effect before thirty days from the time of final passage and are subject to referendum during the interim except:

(1) Ordinances initiated by petition;

(2) Ordinances necessary for immediate preservation of public peace, health, and safety which contain a statement of urgency and are passed by unanimous vote of all the commissioners;

(3) Ordinances providing for local improvement districts.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.230. Prior: (i) 1911 c 116 s 22, part; RRS s 9111, part. (ii) 1911 c 116 s 21, part; RRS s 9110, part.]